Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1409.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2102 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2102. Definitions.--As used in this article, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Behavioral health crisis." A significant disruption in a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 person's mental or emotional stability or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate assessment and treatment to prevent a serious deterioration in the person's mental or physical health.* * *"Serious mental illness." A mental illness, disorder or condition included in the following classes of mental disorders designated in the American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, Text Revision, 2022:(1) Schizophrenia spectrum and other psychotic disorders.(2) Bipolar and related disorders.(3) Depressive disorders.(4) Anxiety disorders.(5) Obsessive-compulsive and related disorders.(6) Feeding and eating disorders.* * *Section 2. Section 2156(b) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2156. Step therapy considerations.* * *(a.1) Step therapy and prior authorization exemption for serious mental illness.--(1) If an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan requires prior authorization or step therapy for a prescription drug prescribed in response to a serious mental illness, the insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan may only require a covered person or enrollee to try one prescription drug other than the drug prescribed by the provider prior to providing authorization to the covered person or enrollee for 20260SB1409PN1876 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the prescription drug prescribed by the provider.(2) A health insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan may not require prior authorization or step therapy for a prescription drug if the prescription drug is:(i) approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration;(ii) used for treatment in response to a behavioral health crisis; and(iii) prescribed consistent with evidence-based standards and medical or scientific evidence.(b) Applicability.--[The] Unless otherwise specified in this section, the standards and time lines specified in section 2155 shall apply to a review of a request for a step therapy exception.Section 3. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20260SB1409PN1876 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526